Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-636
Department; enforcement powers.

The department may cooperate with the Secretary of Agriculture in carrying out applicable federal law and the regulations issued by the Secretary of Agriculture under such law. The department may enter into contracts with any person to implement any or all of the provisions of the Commercial Dog and Cat Operator Inspection Act.

Laws 2000, LB 825, § 12.